New York, session 2025-2026, S1331.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "NYCHA 2 microgrids development and revolving loan act". 3 § 2. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section 4 1879-a to read as follows: 5 § 1879-a. NYCHA microgrid loan program. 1. The authority is hereby 6 authorized and directed to establish a revolving loan fund, subject to 7 available appropriations for such purpose, in order to provide zero-per- 8 cent interest loans to the New York city housing authority to finance 9 energy services from renewable solar energy systems, battery or other 10 zero emission technology storage systems and/or any other renewable 11 generation systems as defined in section sixty-six-p of the public 12 service law for the purpose of implementing any state clean energy stan- 13 dard, all of which are scaled to function as microgrids for housing 14 owned by the New York city housing authority. The authority, in cooper- 15 ation with the New York power authority, shall issue a competitive 16 request for proposals from project developers that are not subject to 17 cost of service ratemaking for the construction and installation of the 18 renewable solar energy systems, battery or other zero emission technolo- 19 gy storage systems and/or any other renewable generation systems as 20 defined in section sixty-six-p of the public service law that are scaled 21 to function as microgrids for New York city housing authority housing. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01255-01-5 S. 1331 2 1 Such microgrid systems funded through this section shall be constructed 2 with consideration given to increasing the demand for electricity caused 3 by the adoption of "beneficial electrification" policies proposed pursu- 4 ant to the climate leadership and community protection act. 5 2. Notwithstanding any policies, practices, or orders by the public 6 service commission to the contrary, if excess energy is generated 7 through the systems, this excess energy generated may be sold back to 8 the grid. 9 § 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, as deemed 10 feasible and advisable by its trustees, the New York power authority is 11 authorized and directed to utilize a portion of its net income to 12 support the restoration of electricity, heat and hot water services to 13 tenants of the New York city housing authority and to provide energy 14 services, including but not limited to electricity, heating, venti- 15 lation, cooling, steam or hot water, to such tenants pursuant to energy 16 performance contracts, as defined by subdivision four of section 9-102 17 of the energy law, through a competitive procurement process. 18 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.